Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 7 Stakes and Buoys

46-7-1.
Marking of Pawtucket River channel.

The director of the department of environmental management shall accurately mark the channel of the Pawtucket River by erecting and placing suitable stakes and buoys along the sides of the channel at the request and for the convenience of persons interested in the navigation of the river. Whatever expenses shall be incurred in the performance of these duties shall be paid from any appropriation which the department of environmental management is or may hereafter be authorized to expend.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1901, ch. 809, § 28; G.L. 1909, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1918, ch. 1669, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-7-1

.

46-7-2.
Misuse or injury to Pawtucket River channel markers.

The owner or the person having charge of any vessel, scow, boat, seine, or raft of any kind, which shall be made fast to any stake or buoy erected or placed for the security or guidance of vessels navigating the river, and every person who shall in any way willfully injure, remove, or destroy any of the stakes or buoys placed, shall be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) and not less than twenty dollars ($20.00), one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the state and one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the complainant, or be imprisoned not exceeding six (6) months nor less than ten (10) days.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 118, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 144, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

46-7-2

.

46-7-3.
Misuse or injury to federally placed markers in upper Narragansett Bay.

Every owner and every person having the charge of any vessel, scow, boat, seine, or raft of any kind, which shall be made fast to any stake or buoy which has been or shall be placed, at the expense of the United States, for the security and direction of vessels either in Providence River or in any part of Narragansett Bay or the waters thereof north of Conimicut Point or in Warren River, and every person who shall in any way injure or destroy any of the stakes and buoys placed, shall forfeit ten dollars ($10.00); two-thirds (2/3) thereof to the use of the United States, in order to replace the stake or buoy, and one-third (1/3) thereof to the use of the person who shall sue for the replacement stake or buoy.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 116, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 142, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 147, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 113, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-7-3

; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 37.

46-7-4.
Venue of forfeiture actions — Limitation.

For any offense committed in Providence River or in any part of Narragansett Bay or the waters thereof north of Conimicut Point, the action may be brought in the county of Providence or in the county of Kent, and the part of the forfeiture belonging to the United States for the offense shall be paid to the collector of the district of Rhode Island; and for any offense committed in Warren River the action may be brought in the county of Bristol, and the part of the forfeiture belonging to the United States for the offense shall be paid to the collector of the district of Rhode Island; and all forfeitures that may accrue under §

46-7-3

shall be sued for within six (6) months after they shall accrue.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 116, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 142, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 147, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 113, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

46-7-4

.

46-7-5.
Misuse or injury to markers in Bristol and Conimicut areas.

Every person who shall make fast any ship, vessel, scow, boat, seine, or raft of any kind to the buoy on the shoal south of Conimicut Point or to the stake on that point or to the flagstaff on the halfway rock or to any stake which has been or may be placed at the mouth of Bristol Harbor, or to any of the moorings of those buoys, and the master or owner of the ship, vessel, scow, boat, seine, or raft, shall forfeit twenty dollars ($20.00); to be recovered in the county of Kent, in the county of Bristol or in the county of Providence; one-third (1/3) thereof to the use of the person who shall sue for the amount due, and two-thirds (2/3) thereof to be paid to the collector of customs within whose district the offense shall be committed, for the use of the United States.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 116, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 142, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 147, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 113, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

46-7-5

; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 7.

46-7-6.
Injuries to Castle Island beacon or markers south of Conimicut.

The captain, owner, or owners of every ship or vessel that shall, by running against or otherwise, injure the beacon on Castle Island, at the entrance of Bristol Harbor, or any buoy placed or hereafter to be placed, at the expense of the United States, in any of the waters of Narragansett Bay south of Conimicut Point or the stakes on the point, or in any way injure, destroy, or remove the chains or anchors by which they are or shall be moored, shall forfeit thirty-six dollars ($36.00), provided the damage is done intentionally or negligently; to be recovered in the county of Kent or in the county of Newport, and to be distributed, paid, and appropriated as provided in §

46-7-5

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 116, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 142, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 147, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 113, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

46-7-6

.